Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4062.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Arizona historical society; continued operations and public services; intent A. The sum of $775,500 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona historical society for continued operations and public services. B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.